District of Columbia statutes.
47-318.05a

Budget submissions required; agency enhancement requests.

The Mayor and the Chief Financial Officer shall supplement all proposed budgets submitted pursuant to § 1-204.42, and related budget documents required by §§ 1-204.42, 1-204.43, and 1-204.44, by submitting to the Council simultaneously with the proposed budget submission:

(1)

Actual copies, not summaries, of all agency budget enhancement requests, including the “Form B” for all District agencies; and

(2)

Any similar documentation describing in detail agencies’ budget needs or requests.

History

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 1011(b), 55 DCR 7598

Short Title

Short title: Section 1010 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle E of title I of the act may be cited as the “Budget Transparency Act of 2008”.